Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 1 General Matters

Cross references.

Limitations on legislature’s powers, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V.

Secretary of State corporations, T. 14, C. 4.

Forgery and criminal issuance of bad checks, §

16-9-1

et seq.

Criminal penalties for illegal use of credit cards or bank services cards, §

16-9-30

et seq.

Bond requirements for banks and trust companies acting as guardian of property, §

29-4-16

.

Authority of notaries public who are officers, employees, or other representatives of banks to take acknowledgment of any party to any written instrument executed to or by such bank, § 45-17-12.

Appointment of banks and trust companies as state depositories, §

50-17-50

et seq.

7-1-240.
Powers and restrictions applicable when acting as bank and trust company.

Any financial institution authorized by law to act as both a bank and a trust company shall enjoy and be subject to the powers and restrictions of a bank of its type in regard to its banking activities and in like manner shall enjoy and be subject to the powers and restrictions of a trust company in regard to its trust activity. With respect to general corporate matters not identified with either banking or trust functions, it shall have the privileges and restrictions of a bank of its type.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-1101, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article, “An Argument Evaluating Price Controls on Bank Credit Cards in Light of Certain Reemerging Common Law Doctrines,” see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 797 (1993).

For article, “An Economic Perspective on Interest Rate Limitations,” see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 821 (1993).

For article, “Regulating Bank Reputation Risk,” see 54 Ga. L. Rev. 523 (2020).

7-1-241.
Restrictions on engaging in banking business.

No person or corporation may lawfully engage in this state in the business of banking or receiving money for deposit or transmission or lawfully establish in this state a place of business for such purpose, except a bank, a national bank, a credit union to the extent provided in Article 3 of this chapter, a licensee engaged in selling payment instruments to the extent permitted by Article 4 of this chapter, an international banking agency to the extent provided in Article 5 of this chapter, or a savings and loan association to the extent provided by the laws of the United States.

None of the following shall be deemed to be engaged in the business of receiving money for deposit or transmission within the meaning of subsection (a) of this Code section:

A club or hotel to the extent it receives money from members or guests for temporary safekeeping;

An express, steamship, or telegraph company to the extent it receives money for transmission;

An attorney at law, real estate agent, fiscal agent, insurance company, utility company, or any other person or corporation to the extent he or she or it receives and transmits money solely as an incident to a business or profession not governed by this chapter;

Persons or corporations engaged in the business of cashing checks, dispensing cash through credit or debit card activated electronic devices, or recording of financial transactions resulting from and initiated at the point of the sale of goods or services; provided, however, that no such person or corporation shall receive deposits except as provided in Code Section 7-1-603 or otherwise engage in the business of banking; or

A securities broker or dealer registered pursuant to the provisions of 15 U.S.C. Section 78o or Chapter 5 of Title 10 to the extent that such securities broker or dealer:

Sells certificates of deposit or interest in certificates of deposit or other deposit instruments issued by a bank or savings association, provided such securities broker or dealer fully and fairly discloses at the time of solicitation and confirmation whether or not federal deposit insurance is available for that deposit instrument;

Purchases certificates of deposit or other deposit instruments issued by a bank or savings association for the account of the customer of such securities broker or dealer, provided that such instruments are registered in the name of the customer or the custodian of such customer on the books or other records of the issuing bank or savings association; or

Holds customer funds incidental to the purchase and sale of securities on behalf of such customer.

The department is authorized to promulgate regulations and establish policy, consistent with the objectives of this chapter, which objectives include for the purposes of this Code section providing for appropriate competition between financial institutions and other financial organizations and protection of the interests of depositors, and to further define, restrict, or require registration of entities which provide financial products and services to the citizens of this state via the Internet, other online access to financial products and services, or alternate methods of delivery which differ from geographically based banking.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 1, § 4; Code 1933, § 13-204; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1170, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 691, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-1102, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 258, § 3; Ga. L. 1986, p. 458, § 4; Ga. L. 1990, p. 301, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 10; Ga. L. 2004, p. 631, § 7; Ga. L. 2008, p. 381, § 2/SB 358; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-5/HB 811; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 7/HB 323; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 7/SB 365; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 7/SB 52.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “15 U.S.C. Section 78o” for “15 U.S.C. Section 780” in paragraph (b)(5).

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “online” for “on-line” near the end of subsection (c).

7-1-242.
Restriction on corporate fiduciaries.

No corporation, partnership, or other entity may lawfully act as a fiduciary in this state except:

A financial institution authorized to act in such capacity pursuant to the provisions of Georgia law;

A trust company;

A national bank or a state bank lawfully doing a banking business in this state and authorized to act as a fiduciary under the laws of the United States or another state;

A savings bank or savings and loan association lawfully doing a banking business in this state and authorized to act as a fiduciary under the laws of the United States or another state;

Attorneys at law licensed to practice in this state, whether organized as a professional corporation or otherwise;

An investment adviser registered pursuant to the provisions of 15 U.S.C. Section 80b-3 or Chapter 5 of Title 10, provided that this exception shall not authorize an investment adviser to act in any fiduciary capacity subject to the provisions of Title 53, relating to wills, trusts, and the administration of estates, or Title 29, relating to guardianships and conservatorships;

A securities broker or dealer registered pursuant to the provisions of 15 U.S.C. Section 78o or Chapter 5 of Title 10 acting in such fiduciary capacity incidental to and as a consequence of its broker or dealer activities; or

A nonprofit corporation.

Acting as a fiduciary for purposes of this Code section includes but is not limited to:

Accepting or executing trusts or otherwise acting as a trustee;

Administering real or tangible personal property located in Georgia or elsewhere. For the purposes of this paragraph, “administer” means to possess, purchase, sell, lease, insure, safekeep, manage, or otherwise oversee; and

Acting pursuant to a court order as personal representative, executor, or administrator of the estate of a deceased person or as guardian or conservator for a minor or incapacitated person.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to repeal or to change Article 15 of Chapter 12 of Title 53 or any other statutes or rules of law on such subject.

History.

Code 1933, § 109-302.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 525, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-1103, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 972, §§ 5, 6; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1366, § 4; Ga. L. 1990, p. 301, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 810, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 13; Ga. L. 2004, p. 631, § 7; Ga. L. 2008, p. 381, § 3/SB 358; Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 2/SB 131.

Cross references.

Substitution of parties to contracts generally, §

13-4-20

.

Impossibility as excuse for nonperformance, §

13-4-21

.

7-1-243.
Restrictions on banking and trust nomenclature.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, no person or corporation except a bank, a national bank, a bank as defined in Code Section 7-1-628.1, a corporation lawfully owning the majority of the voting stock of a bank, a national bank, or a bank as defined in Code Section 7-1-628.1, or a subsidiary of such bank, national bank, bank as defined in Code Section 7-1-628.1, or corporation shall use the words “bank,” “banker,” “banking company,” “banking house,” or any other similar name indicating that the business done is that of a bank upon any sign at its place of business or elsewhere, or upon any of its letterheads, billheads, blank checks, blank notes, receipts, certificates, circulars, advertisements, or any other written or printed matter.

(a.1)

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, no person or corporation except a credit union, a federal credit union, or credit union chartered by another state whose deposits are federally insured, or a subsidiary of such credit union, federal credit union, or credit union chartered by another state whose deposits are federally insured shall use the words “credit union,” or any other similar name indicating that the business done is that of a credit union upon any sign at its place of business or elsewhere, or upon any of its letterheads, billheads, blank checks, blank notes, receipts, certificates, circulars, advertisements, or any other written or printed matter.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, no person or corporation except:

A corporation lawfully authorized to exercise trust powers or any subsidiary thereof;

A corporation lawfully owning the majority of the voting stock of any corporation authorized to exercise trust powers, or any subsidiary of such owner corporation;

An enterprise whose structure is in the nature of a trust where the trustees include a corporation lawfully authorized to exercise trust powers in this state; or

An eleemosynary institution

shall use the words “trust” or “trust company” or any similar name indicating that the business done is that of a trust company upon any sign at its place of business or elsewhere, or upon any of its letterheads, billheads, blank checks, blank notes, receipts, certificates, circulars, advertisements, or any other written or printed matter.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to:

Prevent the use of the words “banks,” “banker,” “banking,” “banker’s,” “trust,” or any similar word in a context clearly not purporting to refer to a banking or a trust business or to a business primarily engaged in the lending of money, underwriting or sale of securities, acting as a financial planner, financial service provider, investment or trust adviser, or acting as a loan broker;

(1.1)

Prevent the use of the words “credit union,” or any similar word in a context clearly not purporting to refer to a credit union or to a business primarily engaged in the lending of money, or accepting shares or deposits or acting as a loan broker;

Prohibit advertisement in media distributed in or transmitted into this state by persons or corporations lawfully engaged in the banking, credit union, or trust business outside of this state; or

Prevent any person or corporation from continuing to use its name legally in use on April 1, 1989.

The department shall advise the Secretary of State of any corporate name or proposed corporate name it deems to be inconsistent with this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1927, p. 344, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, § 109-502; Ga. L. 1974, p. 463, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-1104, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1717, § 3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1366, § 5; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 3; Ga. L. 2009, p. 86, § 4/HB 141; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 7/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 4/HB 780; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 3/HB 111.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, inserted “or a subsidiary of such credit union or federal credit union” in the middle of subsection (a.1). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted “a national bank, a bank as defined in Code Section 7-1-628.1, a corporation lawfully owning the majority of the voting stock of a bank, a national bank, or a bank as defined in Code Section 7-1-628.1, or a subsidiary of such bank, national bank, bank as defined in Code Section 7-1-628.1,” for “a national bank, or a corporation lawfully owning the majority of the voting stock of a bank or national bank or a subsidiary of such bank, national bank” in subsection (a); and, in subsection (a.1), substituted “a credit union, a federal credit union, or credit union chartered by another state whose deposits are federally insured, or a subsidiary of such credit union, federal credit union, or credit union chartered by another state whose deposits are federally insured” for “a credit union or a federal credit union or subsidiary of such credit union or federal credit union”.

Cross references.

Further regulations pertaining to use of names by financial institutions, §

7-1-130

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”

7-1-244.
Deposit insurance requirements; public notices when deposits not properly insured.

Every bank shall obtain and maintain deposit insurance satisfactory to the department; provided, however, that banks which have had their deposit insurance withdrawn or canceled may, in the discretion of the department, continue to accept deposits; provided, further, that such banks shall within six months after such withdrawal or cancellation of insurance obtain deposit insurance, satisfactory to the department, written by an insurance company authorized to transact business in this state or by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. The department may, in its discretion, for cause shown, extend the time limitation in which deposit insurance must be obtained.

Deposit insurance required to be obtained in subsection (a) of this Code section need not be in excess of amounts insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation at the time the insurance is obtained; but wherever the insurance coverage is, in the opinion of the department, less than amounts insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the bank shall be required to post at a conspicuous place near the entrance of such bank a sign in boldface print, in letters at least four inches high, which states “Deposits Not Insured” or “Deposits Insured Up To (insert amount of deposit insurance).” Such wording shall also follow the name of the bank wherever it is written or printed and shall be posted in writing which is easily legible in letters at least one inch high at each window or desk receiving deposits.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 692, § 17; Code 1933, § 41A-1105, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “provided, further, that such” for “provided, further, such” in the second proviso of subsection (a).

Cross references.

Restrictions on advertising for sale instruments purporting to be insured or guaranteed in manner comparable to insured deposit or shared account when such instrument does not in fact possess comparable insurance coverage, §

7-1-133

.

For similar provisions as to deposit insurance requirements for credit unions, §

7-1-666

.

For similar provisions pertaining to building and loan association deposit insurance requirements, §

7-1-797

.